test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-transhee_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tranšej: # Noun 225 'eng /est tranšee/fin' - full paradigm
     tranšej+N+Sg+Nom: tranšej
     tranšej+N+Sg+Gen: tranšej
     tranšej+N+Sg+Par: tranšejt
     tranšej+N+Sg+Dat: tranšejõn
     tranšej+N+Sg+Ins: tranšejõks
     tranšej+N+Sg+Ill: tranšejõ
     tranšej+N+Sg+Ela: tranšejst
     tranšej+N+Pl+Nom: tranšejd
     tranšej+N+Pl+Gen: tranšejd
     tranšej+N+Pl+Par: tranšejḑi
     tranšej+N+Pl+Dat: tranšejdõn
     tranšej+N+Pl+Ins: tranšejdkõks
     tranšej+N+Pl+Ill: tranšejži
     tranšej+N+Pl+Ela: tranšejšti
